Washington statutes.
RCW 37.12.180

Issues related to retrocession under RCW 37.12.160.

(1) The provisions of RCW 37.12.160 do not affect the validity of any retrocession procedure commenced under RCW 37.12.100 through 37.12.140 prior to June 7, 2012.

(2) Any Indian tribe that has commenced but not completed the retrocession procedure authorized in RCW 37.12.100 through 37.12.140 may request retrocession under RCW 37.12.160 in lieu of completing that procedure.

(3) Any Indian tribe that has completed the retrocession procedure authorized in RCW 37.12.100 through 37.12.140 may use the process authorized under RCW 37.12.160 to request retrocession of any civil or criminal jurisdiction retained by the state under RCW 37.12.120 or 37.12.010.

(4) The provisions of RCW 37.12.120 are not applicable to a civil and/or criminal retrocession that is accomplished in accordance with the requirements of RCW 37.12.160.

[ 2012 c 48 s 3.]